Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0406

Annual meeting of members.

(1) Members shall meet annually at a time provided in the organic rules or set by the board of directors not inconsistent with the organic rules.

(2) An annual members meeting may be held inside or outside this state at the place stated in the organic rules or selected by the board of directors not inconsistent with the organic rules.

(3)(a) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide:

(i) If the board of directors or another person is authorized in the bylaws to determine the place of annual meetings, the board of directors or such other person may, in the sole discretion of the board of directors or such other person, determine that an annual meeting will not involve a physical assembly of members at a particular geographic location, but instead will be held solely by means of remote communication, in accordance with (b) of this subsection.

(ii) An association may permit any or all members to participate in an annual members meeting by means of, or conduct the meeting solely through the use of, remote communication. Subject to the provisions of (b) of this subsection, participation by remote communication is to be subject to any guidelines and procedures adopted by or pursuant to the authority of the board of directors.

(b) If an association elects to permit participation by means of, or conduct a meeting solely through the use of, remote communication:

(i) The notice of the meeting must specify how a member may participate in the meeting by means of remote communication.

(ii) The association must implement reasonable measures to (A) verify that each person participating remotely as a member is a member, and (B) provide each person participating remotely as a member a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the members, including an opportunity to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting substantially concurrently with those proceedings.

(iii) Participation in a meeting in accordance with this section constitutes presence in person at that meeting.

(iv) If the board of directors or another authorized person determines to hold an annual members meeting without a physical assembly of members in accordance with this subsection (3), all members entitled to vote at such meeting must have the opportunity to participate in the meeting by remote communication in accordance with this subsection (3).

(4) The board of directors shall report, or cause to be reported, at the association's annual members meeting the association's business and financial condition as of the close of the most recent fiscal year.

(5) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, the board of directors shall designate the presiding officer of the association's annual members meeting.

(6) Failure to hold an annual members meeting does not affect the validity of any action by the limited cooperative association.

[ 2019 c 37 s 406.]